Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska88-539
Supervisor of warehouses; appointment; powers and duties.

For the proper enforcement of the Grain Warehouse Act, the commission shall designate and appoint a person experienced in the handling of grain as supervisor of warehouses. The supervisor may perform all duties required of the commission pursuant to the Grain Warehouse Act subject to the approval of the commission.

Laws 1987, LB 164, § 15.